http://www.opr.ca.gov/localplanning/PDFs/Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg-Act.pdf

   Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000
   (Reorganized and Amended by Legislation Enacted in 2000) NOTE:
   Provisions added by legislation enacted in 2000, primarily AB 2838
   (Chapter 761, Statutes of 2000), are noted in blue underscore. Sections
   which were renumbered from the previous statutory scheme are noted in
   blue [brackets] following the new section number. PART 1 - GENERAL
   CHAPTER 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS 56000. This division
   shall be known and may be cited as the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000. 56001. The Legislature finds and
   declares that it is the policy of the state to encourage orderly growth
   and development which are essential to the social, fiscal, and economic
   well-being of the state. The Legislature recognizes that the logical
   formation and determination of local agency boundaries is an important
   factor in promoting orderly development and in balancing such
   development with sometimes competing state interests of discouraging
   urban sprawl, preserving open space and prime agricultural lands, and
   efficiently extending government services. The Legislature also
   recognizes that providing housing for persons and families of all
   incomes is an important factor in promoting orderly development.
   Therefore, the Legislature further finds and declares that this policy
   should be effected by the logical formation and modification of the
   boundaries of local agencies, with a preference granted to
   accommodating additional growth within, or through the expansion of,
   the boundaries of those local agencies which can best accommodate and
   provide necessary governmental services and housing for persons and
   families of all incomes in the most efficient manner feasible. The
   Legislature recognizes that urban population densities and intensive
   residential, commercial, and industrial development necessitate a broad
   spectrum and high level of community services and controls. The
   Legislature also recognizes that when areas become urbanized to the
   extent that they need the full range of community services, priorities
   are required to be established regarding the type and levels of
   services that the residents of an urban community need and desire; that
   community service priorities be established by weighing the total
   community service needs against the total financial resources available
   for securing community services; and that those community service
   priorities are required to reflect local circumstances, conditions, and
   limited financial resources. The Legislature finds and declares that a
   single multi-purpose governmental agency, is accountable for community
   service needs and financial resources and, therefore, may be the best
   mechanism for establishing community service priorities, especially in
   urban areas. Notwithstanding, the Legislature recognizes the critical
   role of many limited purpose agencies, especially in rural communities.
   The Legislature also finds that, whether governmental services are
   proposed to be provided by a single purpose Local Government
   Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 agency,
   several agencies, or a multi-purpose agency, responsibility should be
   given to the agency or agencies that can best provide government
   services. CHAPTER 2. DEFINITIONS 56010. Unless the provision or context
   otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter govern
   the construction of this division. The definition of a word applies to
   any of that word's variants. 56011. "Affected city" means any city
   which satisfies either of the following conditions: (a) It contains, or
   its sphere of influence contains, territory for which a change of
   organization is proposed or ordered either singularly or as part of a
   reorganization. (b) It would contain the territory described in
   subdivision (a) as a result of proceedings for a change of organization
   or reorganization taken pursuant to this division. 56012. "Affected
   county" means each county which contains, or would contain, any
   territory for which a change of organization or reorganization is
   proposed or ordered or which contains all or any part of a district for
   which a change of organization or reorganization is proposed or ordered
   with respect to territory outside that county. 56013. "Affected
   district" means a special district, as defined by Section 56036, which
   contains, or whose sphere of influence contains, any territory for
   which a reorganization or a change of organization is proposed or
   ordered. 56014. "Affected local agency" means any agency which
   contains, or would contain, or whose sphere of influence contains, any
   territory within any proposal or study to be reviewed by the
   commission. 56015. "Affected territory" means any territory for which a
   change of organization or reorganization is proposed or ordered. 56016.
   "Agricultural lands" means land currently used for the purpose of
   producing an agricultural commodity for commercial purposes, land left
   fallow under a crop rotational program, or land enrolled in an
   agricultural subsidy or set-aside program. 56017. "Annexation" means
   the annexation, inclusion, attachment, or addition of territory to a
   city or district. 56018. "Benefit district" means a district,
   containing lands which are, or will be, benefited by their inclusion
   within the district, the owners of those lands being entitled, under
   state or federal statutes or the California Constitution or the United
   States Constitution, to notice by mail or personal service and hearing
   prior to the inclusion of the lands within the district. Page 2 of 140
   Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and
   Amended in 2000 56019. "Board of directors" means the legislative body
   or governing board of a district. 56020. "Board of supervisors" means
   the board of supervisors of a county. 56020.5. "Certificate of
   completion" means the document prepared by the executive officer and
   recorded with the county recorder that confirms the final successful
   resolution of a change of organization or reorganization. 56020.7.
   "Certificate of termination of proceedings" means the document prepared
   by the executive officer and retained by the commission that indicates
   that a proposal for a change of organization or reorganization was
   terminated because of majority written protest or rejection by voters
   in an election. 56021. "Change of organization" means any of the
   following: (a) A city incorporation. (b) A district formation. (c) An
   annexation to, or detachment from, a city or district. (d) A
   disincorporation of a city. (e) A district dissolution. (f) A
   consolidation of cities or special districts. (g) A merger or
   establishment of a subsidiary district. 56022. REPEALED. 56023. "City"
   means any chartered or general law city, including any city the name of
   which includes the word "town." 56024. "City council" means the city
   council or legislative body of a city. 56025. "City officer" means the
   mayor or a member of the city council. 56026. "Clerk" means the clerk
   or secretary of a county, city, or district, or the clerk or secretary
   of the legislative body of a county, city, or district. Where the
   office of county clerk is separate from the office of the clerk of the
   board of supervisors, "clerk" means the clerk of the board of
   supervisors. Where the office of county clerk is separate from the
   office of the registrar of voters, "clerk" means the registrar of
   voters with respect to all duties pertaining to the conduct of
   elections and the county clerk with respect to all other duties. 56027.
   "Commission" means a local agency formation commission. 56028.
   "Commission proceedings" means proceedings which are taken by a
   commission pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 56650). Page 3
   of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized
   and Amended in 2000 56029. "Conducting authority" means the commission
   of the principal county of the entity proposing a change of
   organization or reorganization, unless another conducting authority is
   specified by law. 56030. "Consolidation" means the uniting or joining
   of two or more cities located in the same county into a single new
   successor city or two or more districts into a single new successor
   district. In the case of consolidation of special districts, all of
   those districts shall have been formed pursuant to the same principal
   act. 56031. (a) "Contiguous" means both of the following: (1) In the
   case of annexation, territory adjacent to, or territory adjoining
   territory within, the local agency to which annexation is proposed. (2)
   In the case of consolidation, territory of a local agency or agencies
   which is adjacent to, or adjoining the territory of, the consolidating
   local agency or to the territory of another local agency which is
   contiguous to the consolidating local agency and to be consolidated
   with the consolidating local agency. (b) Territory is not contiguous if
   the only contiguity is based upon a strip of land more than 300 feet
   long and less than 200 feet wide, that width to be exclusive of
   highways. 56032. "County officer" means a member of the board of
   supervisors. 56033. "Detachment" means the detachment, deannexation,
   exclusion, deletion, or removal from a city or district of any portion
   of the territory of that city or district. 56034. "Disincorporation"
   means the disincorporation, dissolution, extinguishment, and
   termination of the existence of a city and the cessation of its
   corporate powers, except for the purpose of winding up the affairs of
   the city. 56035. "Dissolution" means the dissolution, disincorporation,
   extinguishment, and termination of the existence of a district and the
   cessation of all its corporate powers, except for the purpose of
   winding up the affairs of the district. 56036. (a) "District" or
   "special district" means an agency of the state, formed pursuant to
   general law or special act, for the local performance of governmental
   or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. "District" or
   "special district" includes a county service area, but excludes all of
   the following: (1) The state. (2) A county. (3) A city. (4) A school
   district or a community college district. (5) A special assessment
   district. (6) An improvement district. Page 4 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 (7) A community facilities district formed pursuant to the
   Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, Chapter 2.5 (commencing
   with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5. (8) A permanent
   road division formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section
   1160) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Streets and Highways Code. (9)
   An air pollution control district or an air quality maintenance
   district. (10) A service zone of a fire protection district. (b) Except
   as otherwise provided in paragraph (1), each of the entities listed in
   paragraph (1) is a "district" or a "special district" for the purposes
   of this division. (1) For the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with
   Section 57000) to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 57175), inclusive,
   of Part 4 or Part 5 (commencing with Section 57300), none of the
   following entities is a "district" or a "special district": (A) A
   unified or union high school library district. (B) A bridge and highway
   district. (C) A joint highway district. (D) A transit or rapid transit
   district. (E) A metropolitan water district. (F) A separation of grade
   district. (2) Any proceedings pursuant to Part 4, commencing with
   Section 57000, for a change of organization involving an entity
   described in paragraph (1) shall be conducted pursuant to the principal
   act authorizing the establishment of that entity. (c) Except as
   otherwise provided in paragraph (1), each of the entities listed in
   paragraph (1) is a "district" or "special district" for purposes of
   this division. (1) For the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with
   Section 57000) to Chapter 7 commencing with Section 57175), inclusive,
   of Part 4 or Part 5 (commencing with Section 57300), none of the
   following entities is a "district" or "special district" if the
   commission of the principal county determines, in accordance with
   Sections 56127 and 56128, that the entity is not a "district" or
   "special district." (A) A flood control district. (B) A flood control
   and floodwater conservation district. (C) A flood control and water
   conservation district. (D) A conservation district. (E) A water
   conservation district. (F) A water replenishment district. (G) The
   Orange County Water District. (H) A California water storage district.
   (I) A water agency. (J) A county water authority or a water authority.
   (2) If the commission determines that an entity described in paragraph
   (1) is not a "district" or "special district," any proceedings pursuant
   to Part 4, commencing with Section 57000, for a change of organization
   involving the entity shall be conducted pursuant to the principal act
   authorizing the establishment of that entity. Page 5 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 56037. "District of limited powers" means an airport district,
   community services district, municipal utility district, public
   utilities district, fire protection district, harbor district, port
   district, recreational harbor district, small craft harbor district,
   resort improvement district, library district, local hospital district,
   local health district, municipal improvement district formed pursuant
   to any special act, municipal water district, police protection
   district, recreation and park district, garbage disposal district,
   garbage and refuse disposal district, sanitary district, county
   sanitation district, public cemetery district, California water
   district, county water district, county waterworks district, or
   irrigation district. 56037.5. "Elections official" shall have the same
   meaning as in Section 320 of the Elections Code. 56038. "Executive
   officer" means the executive officer appointed by a commission.
   56038.5. "Feasible" means capable of being accomplished in a successful
   manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account
   economic, legal, social, and technological factors. 56039. "Formation"
   means the formation, incorporation, organization, or creation of a
   district. 56040. "Function" means any power granted by law to a local
   agency or a county to provide designated governmental or proprietary
   services or facilities for the use, benefit, or protection of persons
   or property. 56041. "Improvement district" means a district, area, or
   zone formed for the sole purpose of designating an area, which is to
   bear a special tax or assessment for an improvement benefiting that
   area. 56042. "Include," except when used in relation to the inclusion
   of land, does not necessarily exclude matters not enumerated. 56043.
   "Incorporation" means the incorporation, formation, creation, and
   establishment of a city with corporate powers. Any area proposed for
   incorporation as a new city shall have at least 500 registered voters
   residing within the affected area at the time commission proceedings
   are initiated. 56044. "Independent special district" includes any
   special district having a legislative body all of whose members are
   elected by registered voters or landowners within the district, or
   whose members are appointed to fixed terms, and excludes any special
   district having a legislative body consisting, in whole or in part, of
   ex officio members who are officers of a county or another local agency
   or who are appointees of those officers other than those who are
   appointed to fixed terms. "Independent special district" does not
   include any district excluded from the definition of district contained
   in Section 56036. Page 6 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization
   Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 56045. "Independent
   special district officer" means the presiding officer or a member of
   the legislative body of an independent special district. 56046.
   "Inhabited territory" means territory within which there reside 12 or
   more registered voters. The date on which the number of registered
   voters is determined is the date of the adoption of a resolution of
   application by the legislative body pursuant to Section 56654, if the
   legislative body has complied with subdivision (b) of that section, or
   the date a petition or other resolution of application is accepted for
   filing and a certificate of filing is issued by the executive officer.
   All other territory shall be deemed "uninhabited." 56047. "Initiate" or
   "initiation" means the acceptance for filing and the issuance of a
   certificate of filing by the executive officer. 56047.5. "Interested
   agency" means each local agency which provides facilities or services
   in the affected territory that a subject agency would provide. 56048.
   (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) or (c), "landowner"
   or "owner of land" means all of the following: (1) Any person shown as
   the owner of land on the most recent assessment roll being prepared by
   the county at the time the conducting authority adopts a resolution of
   application except where that person is no longer the owner. Where that
   person is no longer the owner, the landowner or owner of land is any
   person entitled to be shown as owner of land on the next assessment
   roll. (2) Where land is subject to a recorded written agreement of
   sale, any person shown in the agreement as purchaser. (3) Any public
   agency owning land. (b) "Landowner" or "owner of land" does not include
   a public agency which owns highways, rights-of-way, easements,
   waterways, or canals. (c) For the purpose of mailed notice provided
   pursuant to Section 56157, "landowner" or "owner of land" means each
   person to whom land is assessed, as shown upon the last equalized
   assessment roll of the county, at the address shown upon that
   assessment roll. 56049. "Landowner-voter" means any person entitled to
   vote in a landowner-voter district, or the legal representative of that
   person or, in the case of an election, the proxy of that person. 56050.
   "Landowner-voter district" means a district whose principal act
   provides that owners of land within the district are entitled to vote
   upon the election of district officers, the incurring of bonded
   indebtedness, or any other district matter. 56051. "Last equalized
   assessment roll" means the last equalized assessment roll or book used
   by a county, city, or district for the purpose of the annual levy and
   collection of any taxes or assessments imposed by the county, city, or
   district. Page 7 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of
   2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 This section does not require
   the use of the supplemental roll prepared pursuant to Chapter 3.5
   (commencing with Section 75) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue
   and Taxation Code. 56052. "Legal representative" means an officer of a
   corporation duly authorized, by the bylaws or a resolution of the board
   of directors of the corporation, to sign for, and on behalf of, the
   corporation. Legal representative also includes a guardian,
   conservator, executor, administrator, or other person holding property
   in a trust capacity under appointment of a court, when authorized by an
   order of the court. The order of the court may be made without notice.
   56053. "Legislative body" means the legislative body or governing board
   of a city, special district, or county. 56054. "Local agency" means a
   city, county, or district. 56055. "Member district" means any district
   which is included, in whole or in part, within another district, a
   metropolitan water district, or any of the entities enumerated in
   subdivision (c) of Section 56036, all or any part of the
   first-mentioned district being entitled, under the provisions of the
   principal act of the second-mentioned district or entity, to receive or
   be furnished with any governmental or proprietary service or commodity
   by the second-mentioned district or entity. 56056. "Merger" means the
   extinguishment, termination, and cessation of the existence of a
   district of limited powers by the merger of that district with a city
   as a result of proceedings taken pursuant to this division. 56057.
   "Next equalized assessment roll" means the next assessment roll or book
   to be equalized and used by a city, county, or district for the purpose
   of the annual levy and collection of any taxes or assessments imposed
   by the city, county, or district. 56058. "Notice" means any matter
   authorized or required by this division to be published, posted, or
   mailed. 56059. "Open space" means any parcel or area of land or water
   which is substantially unimproved and devoted to an open-space use, as
   defined in Section 65560. 56060. "Open-space use" means any use as
   defined in Section 65560. 56061. "Overlap" or "overlapping territory"
   means territory which is included within the boundaries of two or more
   districts or within one or more districts and a city or cities. 56062.
   "Parent district" means any district, a metropolitan water district, or
   any of the entities enumerated in subdivision (c) of Section 56036,
   which includes all or any part of another district, the first-mentioned
   district or entity being obligated, under the provisions of the
   principal act of Page 8 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization
   Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 the first-mentioned
   district or entity, to provide and furnish any governmental or
   proprietary service or commodity to the second-mentioned district.
   56063. "Plan of reorganization" means a plan or program for effecting a
   reorganization and which contains a description of all changes of
   organization included in the reorganization and setting forth all
   terms, conditions, and matters necessary or incidental to the
   effectuation of that reorganization. 56064. "Prime agricultural land"
   means an area of land, whether a single parcel or contiguous parcels,
   that have not been developed for a use other than an agricultural use
   and that meets any of the following qualifications: (a) Land that, if
   irrigated, qualifies for rating as class I or class II in the USDA
   Natural Resources Conservation Service land use capability
   classification, whether or not the land is actually irrigated, provided
   that irrigation is feasible. (b) Land that qualifies for rating 80
   through 100 Storie Index Rating. (c) Land that supports livestock used
   for the production of food and fiber and that has an annual carrying
   capacity equivalent to at least one animal unit per acre as defined by
   the United States Department of Agriculture in the National Handbook on
   Range and Related Grazing Lands, July, 1967, developed pursuant to
   Public Law 46, December 1935. (d) Land planted with fruit or
   nut-bearing trees, vines, bushes, or crops that have a nonbearing
   period of less than five years and that will return during the
   commercial bearing period on an annual basis from the production of
   unprocessed agricultural plant production not less than four hundred
   dollars ($400) per acre. (e) Land that has returned from the production
   of unprocessed agricultural plant products an annual gross value of not
   less than four hundred dollars ($400) per acre for three of the
   previous five calendar years. 56065. "Principal act" means, in the case
   of a district, the law under which the district was formed and, in the
   case of a city, the general laws or a charter, as the case may be.
   56066. "Principal county" means the county having all or the greater
   portion of the entire assessed value, as shown on the last equalized
   assessment roll of the county or counties, of all taxable property
   within a district or districts for which a change of organization or
   reorganization is proposed. 56067. "Proceeding," "proceeding for a
   change of organization," or " proceeding for a reorganization" means
   proceedings taken by the commission for a proposed change of
   organization or reorganization pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with
   Section 57000). 56068. "Proponent" means the person or persons who file
   a notice of intention to circulate a petition with the executive
   officer. Page 9 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of
   2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 56069. "Proposal" means a
   request or statement of intention made by petition or by resolution of
   application of a legislative body or of a school district proposing
   proceedings for the change of organization or reorganization described
   in the request or statement of intention. 56070. "Public agency" means
   the state or any state agency, board, or commission, any city, county,
   city and county, special district, or other political subdivision, or
   any agency, board, or commission of the city, county, city and county,
   special district, or other political subdivision. 56071. "Registered
   voter" means any elector registered under, and pursuant to, the
   Elections Code. 56072. "Registered-voter district" means a district
   whose principal act provides that registered voters residing within the
   district are entitled to vote for the election of district officers,
   incurring of bonded indebtedness, or any other district matter. 56073.
   "Reorganization" means two or more changes of organization initiated in
   a single proposal. 56074. "Service" means a class established within,
   and as a part of, a single function, as provided by regulations adopted
   by the commission pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56820)
   of Part 3. 56075. "Special assessment district" means an area fixed,
   established, and formed by a city, county, district, or the state,
   pursuant to general law, special act, or charter, that is specially
   benefited by, and assessed, or to be assessed, to pay the costs and
   expenses of, acquiring any lands or rights-of-way, acquiring or
   constructing any public improvements, maintaining or operating any
   public improvement, or lighting any public street, highway, or place.
   56075.5. "Special reorganization" means a reorganization that includes
   the detachment of territory from a city or city and county and the
   incorporation of that entire detached territory as a city. 56076.
   "Sphere of influence" means a plan for the probable physical boundaries
   and service area of a local agency, as determined by the commission.
   56077. "Subject agency" means each district or city for which a change
   of organization is proposed or provided in a reorganization or plan of
   reorganization. 56078. "Subsidiary district" means a district of
   limited powers in which a city council is designated as, and empowered
   to act as, the ex officio board of directors of the district. Page 10
   of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized
   and Amended in 2000 56079. "Sufficient petition" means a petition
   which, upon its filing and certification, requires the commission to
   hold a hearing and make determinations with respect to the proposal
   contained in the petition. 56080. "Urban service area" means developed,
   undeveloped, or agricultural land, either incorporated or
   unincorporated, within the sphere of influence of a city, which is
   served by urban facilities, utilities, and services or which are
   proposed to be served by urban facilities, utilities, and services
   during the first five years of an adopted capital improvement program
   of the city if the city adopts that type of program for those
   facilities, utilities, and services. The boundary around an urban area
   shall be called the "urban service area boundary" and shall be
   developed in cooperation with a city and adopted by a commission
   pursuant to policies adopted by the commission in accordance with
   Sections 56300, 56301, and 56425. 56081. "Voter" means a
   landowner-voter or a registered voter. CHAPTER 3. INTRODUCTORY AND
   GENERAL PROVISIONS 56100. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2)
   of subdivision (b) of Section 56036, paragraph (2) of subdivision (c)
   of Section 56036, and Section 56101, this division provides the sole
   and exclusive authority and procedure for the initiation, conduct, and
   completion of changes of organization and reorganization for cities and
   districts. All changes of organization and reorganizations shall be
   initiated, conducted, and completed in accordance with, and as provided
   in, this division. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
   proceedings for the formation of a district shall be conducted as
   authorized by the principal act of the district proposed to be formed,
   except that the commission shall serve as the conducting authority and
   the procedural requirements of this division shall apply and shall
   prevail in the event of a conflict with the procedural requirements of
   the principal act of the district. In the event of such a conflict, the
   commission shall specify the procedural requirements which apply,
   consistent with the requirements of this section. 56100.1. A commission
   may require, through the adoption of written policies and procedures,
   the disclosure of contributions, as defined in Section 82015,
   expenditures, as defined in 82025, and independent expenditures, as
   defined in Section 82031, made in support of or opposition to a
   proposal. Disclosure shall be made either to the commission's executive
   officer, in which case it shall be posted on the commission's website,
   if applicable, or to the board of supervisors of the county in which
   the commission is located, which may designate a county officer to
   receive the disclosure. Disclosure pursuant to a requirement under the
   authority provided in this section shall be in addition to any
   disclosure required by Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) or by
   local ordinance. 56101. This division does not apply to any proceeding
   for a change of organization or reorganization for which the
   application shall have been accepted for filing by the executive
   officer pursuant to Section 56658 prior to January 1, 2001. These
   pending proceedings may be Page 11 of 140 Pages Local Government
   Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 continued
   and completed under, and in accordance with, the provisions of law
   under which the proceedings were commenced. The repeals, amendments,
   and additions made by the act enacting this division shall not apply to
   any of those pending proceedings, and, the laws existing prior to
   January 1, 2001, shall continue in full force and effect, as applied to
   those pending proceedings. 56102. For the purpose of any action to
   determine or contest the validity of any change of organization or
   reorganization, the change of organization or reorganization shall be
   deemed to be completed and in existence upon the date of execution of
   the certificate of completion. 56103. An action to determine the
   validity of any change of organization or reorganization completed
   pursuant to this division shall be brought pursuant to Chapter 9
   (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of
   Civil Procedure. 56104. If any provision of this division or the
   application of any provision of this division in any circumstance or to
   any person, city, county, district, the state, or any agency or
   subdivision of the state is held invalid, that invalidity shall not
   affect other provisions or applications of this division which can be
   given effect without the invalid provision or application of the
   invalid provision, and to this end the provisions of this division are
   severable. 56105. Any protest or objection pertaining to the regularity
   or sufficiency of any proceedings or commission proceedings shall be in
   writing, clearly specify the defect, error, irregularity, or omission
   to which protest or objection is made and shall be filed within the
   time and in the manner provided by this division. Any protest or
   objection pertaining to any of these matters which is not so made and
   filed is deemed voluntarily waived. 56106. Any provisions in this
   division governing the time within which an official or the commission
   is to act shall in all instances, except for notice requirements and
   the requirements of subdivision (i) of Section 56658, be deemed
   directory, rather than mandatory. 56107. (a) This division shall be
   liberally construed to effectuate its purposes. No change of
   organization or reorganization ordered under this division and no
   resolution adopted by the commission making determinations upon a
   proposal shall be invalidated because of any defect, error,
   irregularity, or omission in any act, determination, or procedure which
   does not adversely and substantially affect the rights of any person,
   city, county, district, the state, or any agency or subdivision of the
   state. (b) All determinations made by a commission under, and pursuant
   to, this division shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud
   or prejudicial abuse of discretion. (c) In any action or proceeding to
   attack, review, set aside, void or annul a determination by a
   commission on grounds of noncompliance with this division, any inquiry
   shall extend only to whether there was fraud or a prejudicial abuse of
   discretion. Prejudicial abuse of discretion is established if the court
   finds that the determination or decision is not supported by
   substantial evidence in light of the whole record. Page 12 of 140 Pages
   Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended
   in 2000 56111.1. REPEALED. 56111.6. REPEALED. 56111.7. REPEALED.
   56111.9. REPEALED. 56111.10. REPEALED. 56111.11. REPEALED. 56111.12.
   REPEALED. 56111.13. REPEALED. 56111.14. REPEALED. 56116. The
   Legislature declares that the doctrine of automatic merger of a
   district with a city or the merger by operation of law of a district
   with a city has no further force or effect. The existence of a district
   shall not be extinguished or terminated as a result of the entire
   territory of that district being heretofore or hereafter included
   within a city unless that district is merged with the city as a result
   of proceedings taken pursuant to this division. 56117. A district of
   limited powers may be either merged with, or established as, a
   subsidiary district of a city in the manner provided in this division.
   A mutual service agreement between a city and a district of limited
   powers may provide that the city shall not, while that agreement is in
   effect, or during any portion of the agreement's effective duration as
   the city and the district may stipulate in the agreement, initiate a
   proposal to establish the district as a subsidiary district of the
   city. 56118. Except for a proposal for the merger of a then existing
   subsidiary district, any proposal for a merger or establishment of a
   subsidiary district authorized by this division shall contain a request
   in the alternative, requesting either a merger or the establishment of
   a subsidiary district, as may be determined during the course of the
   proceedings. Any proposal requesting only merger shall be deemed to
   also include a request for the establishment of a subsidiary district
   and any proposal requesting only the establishment of a subsidiary
   district shall be deemed to also include a request for merger. 56119.
   It is not necessary for the principal act of any district to adopt or
   incorporate this division by reference and any change of organization
   or reorganization provided for by this division may be made by, or with
   respect to, any district. Except as otherwise provided in this
   division, in any Page 13 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization
   Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 change of organization
   or reorganization the principal act shall govern as to any provisions
   in the principal act pertaining to boundaries, to contiguity or
   noncontiguity of territory, to the incorporated or unincorporated
   status of territory, and to the overlapping of territory of a district
   with the territory of another district or city. Unless otherwise
   provided by the principal act, any territory annexed to a district
   shall be contiguous to the district and shall not be a part of another
   district formed under the same principal act without the consent of the
   other district. 56120. Where the principal act of any parent district
   provides that the boundaries of the parent district shall be
   automatically changed in the event of a change in the boundaries of a
   member district, or that the boundaries of the parent district may be
   concurrently changed with a change in the boundaries of a member
   district, the boundaries of the parent district shall be deemed to be
   automatically, or may be concurrently, changed as the case may be, when
   proceedings are in accordance with the provisions of the principal acts
   of any parent district, upon completion of a change of organization or
   a reorganization changing the boundaries of the member district. The
   commission of the principal county of the member district shall have
   exclusive jurisdiction over such a change in boundaries of the member
   district and also of any parent district subject to this division.
   56121. No change of organization or reorganization, or any term or
   condition of a change of organization or reorganization, shall impair
   the rights of any bondholder or other creditor of any county, city, or
   district. Nor shall any change of organization or reorganization, or
   any term or condition of a change of organization or reorganization,
   impair the contract rights, or contracts entered into by a public
   entity created by a joint exercise of powers agreement established
   pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of
   Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding any
   provision of this division, or of any change of organization or
   reorganization, or any term or condition of a change of organization or
   reorganization, each and every bondholder or other creditor may enforce
   all of his or her rights in the same manner, and to the same extent, as
   if the change of organization, reorganization, term, or condition had
   not been made. Those rights may also be enforced against agencies, and
   their respective officers, as follows: (a) Annexation or detachment:
   against the city or district to, or from, which territory is annexed or
   detached. (b) Incorporation: against the newly incorporated city. (c)
   Formation: against the newly formed district. (d) Disincorporation:
   against the successor county receiving distribution of the remaining
   assets of the disincorporated city. (e) Dissolution: against the local
   agency receiving distribution of all or any part of the remaining
   assets of a dissolved district. (f) Consolidation: against the
   consolidated successor city or district. (g) Reorganization: against
   the affected city or district, successor county or newly incorporated
   city or newly formed district, as the case may be, for any of the above
   enumerated changes of organization or city incorporations which may be
   included in the particular reorganization. Page 14 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 56122. Section 56886 and any term and condition provided by, or
   made pursuant to, that section shall be enforceable by, between, among,
   and against any public agency or agencies designated in the term and
   condition, but shall not constitute, or be given effect as, a
   limitation upon the power of any bondholder or other creditor to
   enforce his or her rights, particularly any rights provided for by Part
   5 (commencing with Section 57300), as if Section 56886 had not been
   enacted or the term and condition had not been made or provided
   pursuant to that section. 56123. Except as otherwise provided in
   Section 56124, if a proposed change of organization or a reorganization
   applies to two or more affected counties, for the purpose of this
   division, exclusive jurisdiction shall be vested in the commission of
   the principal county. Any notices, proceedings, orders, or any other
   acts authorized or required to be given, taken, or made by the
   commission, board of supervisors, clerk of a county, or any other
   county official, shall be given, taken, or made by the persons holding
   those offices in the principal county. The commission of the principal
   county must provide notice to the chair, each board member, and the
   executive officer of all affected agencies of any proceedings, actions
   or reports on the proposed change of organization or reorganization.
   Any officer of a county other than the principal county shall cooperate
   with the commission of the principal county and shall furnish the
   commission of the principal county with any certificates, records, or
   certified copies of records as may be necessary to enable the
   commission of the principal county to comply with this division. 56124.
   If a proposed change of organization or a reorganization applies to two
   or more affected counties, for purposes of this division, exclusive
   jurisdiction may be vested in the commission of an affected county
   other than the commission of the principal county if all of the
   following occur: (a) The commission of the principal county approves of
   having exclusive jurisdiction vested in the commission of another
   affected county. (b) The commission of the principal county designates
   the commission of affected county which shall assume exclusive
   jurisdiction. (c) The commission of the affected county so designated
   agrees to assume exclusive jurisdiction. If exclusive jurisdiction is
   vested in the commission of an affected county other than the principal
   county pursuant to this section, any notices, proceedings, orders, or
   any other acts authorized or required to be given, taken, or made by
   the commission, board of supervisors, clerk of a county, or any other
   officer of a county, shall be given, taken, or made by the persons
   holding those offices in the affected county. Any officer of a county
   other than the affected county shall cooperate with the commission of
   the affected county and shall furnish the commission of the affected
   county with any certificates, records, or certified copies of records
   as may be necessary to enable the commission of the affected county to
   comply with this division. 56125. If any reorganization provides for
   the formation of any new district or districts, the district or
   districts shall be deemed to have been formed upon compliance with the
   procedure and Page 15 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act
   of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 provisions of this division
   relating to reorganization. If the terms and conditions of any change
   of organization or reorganization provide for the formation of an
   improvement district or for the annexation of territory to, or
   detachment of territory from, an existing improvement district, that
   formation, annexation, or detachment shall be deemed to have been
   completed upon compliance with the procedure and provisions of this
   division relating to a change of organization or a reorganization. In
   any proceeding for a change of organization or a reorganization
   providing for territory to be formed into, or annexed to, or detached
   from, an improvement district, the clerk of the county or of the
   district, as the case may be, shall give mailed notice of hearing on
   the proposed change of organization or reorganization to all landowners
   owning land within the territory. No further or separate proceedings
   need be taken for the formation of any improvement district or for the
   annexation of territory to, or detachment of territory from, the
   existing improvement district. To that extent only, this division shall
   govern and provide the exclusive procedure for the formation of any
   such improvement district or for the annexation of territory to, or
   detachment of territory from, an existing improvement district and the
   provisions of the principal act relating to the formation of an
   improvement district or for the annexation of territory to, or
   detachment of territory from, an existing improvement district shall
   have no application. 56126. Upon request by the executive officer or
   the clerk of any county or district, the assessor of any city, county,
   or district shall furnish estimated assessed valuations, determined by
   the same methods and valuations used in preparing the last equalized
   assessment roll, in both of the following cases: (a) Where real
   property is owned by a public agency and no assessed value for that
   real property is shown on the roll. (b) Where a single assessment
   parcel shown on the last equalized assessment roll either: (1) Has been
   split into two or more parcels by reason of the sale or conveyance of
   any portion of the original assessment parcel. (2) Overlaps two or more
   counties, cities, districts, or election precincts, or any combination
   of those entities or precincts. Any of these estimates shall be
   conclusively presumed to be assessed values for the purpose of this
   division, but shall be given no force or effect for other purposes.
   56127. If the legislative body of any of the districts, agencies, or
   authorities enumerated in subdivision (c) of Section 56036 desires a
   determination by the commission that the district, agency, or authority
   is not a district or a special district, for purposes of Part 4
   (commencing with Section 57000) or Part 5 (commencing with Section
   57300), the legislative body, prior to the adoption of any ordinance,
   resolution, or order proposing, declaring an intention, or initiating
   proceedings to make a change of organization, shall make application to
   the commission of the principal county describing the proposed change
   of organization and requesting that determination. If a proposal is
   initiated by other than the legislative body of a district or special
   district, the district or special district may, within 10 days of
   notification by the commission of the initiation of the proposal,
   request a determination by the commission that it is not a district or
   special Page 16 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of
   2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 district for purposes of Part 4
   (commencing with Section 57000) or Part 5 (commencing with Section
   57300). That application shall be filed with the executive officer and
   shall be presented to the commission not later than its next regular
   meeting. The executive officer shall give the legislative body filing
   the application mailed notice of the time and place at which the
   application shall be presented to the commission. No other notice is
   required to be given. However, the commission may, prior to making its
   findings and determinations, order the executive officer to give notice
   of the filing and presentation of the application by publication or by
   mailing to other affected counties, cities, and districts, or by both
   publication and mailing. 56128. (a) Upon presentation of any
   application filed pursuant to Section 56127, the commission shall
   determine that the applicant district, agency, or authority is not a
   district or special district for purposes of Part 4 (commencing with
   Section 57000) or Part 5 (commencing with Section 57300), if the
   commission finds that the applicant is not engaged in any of the
   following: (1) The distribution and sale for any purpose, other than
   for the purpose of resale, of water or of gas or electricity for light,
   heat, or power. (2) Furnishing sanitary sewer service or garbage and
   refuse collection service to the ultimate users, as defined in
   subdivision (b), of those services. (3) Providing fire or police
   protection. (4) The acquisition, construction, maintenance, lighting,
   or operation of streets and highways, street and highway improvements,
   or park and recreation facilities, except as an incident to the
   exercise of other lawful powers of the applicant. (b) "Ultimate user"
   means any user or consumer other than the state, the United States, a
   city, a county, or a district, or any agency, department, or office of
   any of those entities or a public utility. If the commission determines
   that any applicant district, agency, or authority enumerated in
   subdivision (c) of Section 56036 is not a district or special district,
   for purposes of Part 4 (commencing with Section 57000) or Part 5
   (commencing with Section 57300), then those provisions shall not apply
   to the change of organization or reorganization described in the
   application and proceedings for the change of organization or
   reorganization shall be taken under and pursuant to the principal act.
   If no application is made to the commission, or if the commission in
   passing upon an application does not determine that the applicant is
   not a district or special district for the purposes of Part 4
   (commencing with Section 57000) or Part 5 (commencing with Section
   57300), then, except as otherwise provided in Section 56115, this
   division shall provide the sole and exclusive authority for the
   initiation, conduct, and completion for a change of organization or
   reorganization by that district, agency, or authority and, to the
   extent of any inconsistency between this division and the principal act
   of the applicant, this division shall control. 56129. (a) If a public
   utility has been granted a certificate of public convenience and
   necessity authorizing and requiring it to furnish gas or electric
   service within a certain service area and, as a result of a change of
   organization or a reorganization, territory consisting of all, or any
   part, of that service area becomes a part of, or is formed into, a
   district authorized by its principal act to Page 17 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 furnish gas or electric service, the district shall not furnish
   that service within the territory except upon approval by both of the
   following: (1) The commission after receipt and consideration of the
   report of the Public Utilities Commission made as provided in Section
   56131. (2) The voters within the territory, given at an election as
   provided in Section 56130. (b) If both of those approvals are given,
   upon assumption of service by the district the public utility may at
   any time thereafter withdraw service within the territory, unless
   otherwise ordered by the Public Utilities Commission. (c) "Gas or
   electric service," as used in this section and in Sections 56130,
   56131, and 56875, means the distribution and sale for any purpose,
   other than for the purpose of resale, of gas or electricity for light,
   heat, or power. 56130. Voter approval within the territory, as required
   by Section 56129, shall be given at an election. The question submitted
   at the election shall identify the district, designate the kind of
   service to be furnished, identify the territory within which the
   service is proposed to be furnished, and state the name of the public
   utility presently authorized to furnish the gas or electric service
   within the territory. The district shall not furnish the gas or
   electric service, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 56129,
   within the territory unless the question of furnishing the gas or
   electric service has been submitted to the voters at an election
   called, held, and conducted within the territory and a majority of the
   votes cast upon the question are in favor of the service. The board of
   supervisors or the legislative body of the conducting district may
   submit the question at the election called upon the question of
   confirmation of an order of change of organization or reorganization,
   or the board of directors of the district may submit the question of
   the gas or electric service at a special election called after
   completion of the proceedings for a change of organization or a
   reorganization. The question of the service shall be submitted as a
   separate proposition at any election within the territory and shall be
   voted upon only by qualified voters within the territory. If the
   question is defeated at the election, for one year thereafter no
   petition requesting the gas or electric service may be filed and no new
   election called upon the question. 56131. The executive officer shall
   file with the Public Utilities Commission a certified copy of any
   proposal for a change of organization or a reorganization which
   provides, as a part of the change of organization or reorganization,
   that gas or electric service, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section
   56129, be furnished by a district within any of the territory affected
   by the change of organization or reorganization. The certified copy
   need not contain any signatures if the proposal is by petition. After
   that change of organization or reorganization has been ordered, the
   clerk of the district shall file with the Public Utilities Commission a
   certified copy of any ordinance, resolution, or order made by the board
   of directors of a district proposing to furnish gas or electric
   service, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 56129, within the
   territory. After that filing, the Public Utilities Commission shall
   cause an investigation to be made and may conduct any hearings in
   connection with the proposal. Upon completion of the investigation and
   not later than 90 days after the date of the filing, the Public
   Utilities Commission shall make a report to the commission stating
   whether, in the opinion of the Public Utilities Commission, the Page 18
   of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized
   and Amended in 2000 proposed service by the district within the
   territory will substantially impair the ability of the public utility
   to provide adequate service at reasonable rates within the remainder of
   the service area of the public utility. The secretary of the Public
   Utilities Commission shall immediately file a certified copy of that
   report with the executive officer. 56131.5. Upon the filing of an
   application for the formation of, annexation to, consolidation of, or
   dissolution of a local hospital district created pursuant to Division
   23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code or of
   an application for a reorganization including any of those changes of
   organization or the initiation by the commission of any of those
   changes of organization or any reorganization including any of those
   changes of organization, the commission shall notify all state agencies
   that have oversight or regulatory responsibility over, or a contractual
   relationship with, the local hospital district that is the subject of
   the proposed change of organization or reorganization, of its receipt
   of the application or the initiation by the commission of the proposed
   change of organization or reorganization and the proposal, including,
   but not limited to, the following: (a) The State Department of Health
   Services, including, but not limited to, Licensing and Certification
   and the Medi-Cal Division. (b) The Office of Statewide Health Planning
   and Development, including, but not limited to, the Cal-Mortgage Loan
   Insurance Division. (c) The California Health Facilities Financing
   Authority. (d) The California Medical Assistance Commission. A state
   agency shall have 60 days from the date of receipt of notification by
   the commission to comment on the proposal. The commission shall
   consider all comments received from any state agency in making its
   decision. 56132. (a) This section shall only apply to any change of
   organization or reorganization that includes detachment of territory
   from the Broadmoor Police Protection District in the County of San
   Mateo and which includes or accommodates, or is intended to facilitate,
   an annexation of territory to another local agency that has initiated
   the change of organization or reorganization. This section does not,
   however, apply to any territory comprising real property owned by the
   San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District. If the commission adopts
   a resolution approving such a change of organization or reorganization,
   the board of commissioners of the district may, within 15 days
   thereafter, adopt a resolution finding either that the proposed
   detachment may or will not adversely affect the district's ability to
   efficiently provide its law enforcement services in the remainder of
   the district. The district shall, if it adopts a resolution, file a
   certified copy of its resolution with the local agency to which the
   affected territory is proposed to be annexed and the commission. If
   that resolution finds that the proposed detachment may have an adverse
   financial effect, then the reorganization shall not become effective
   unless a majority of the voters voting at a special election of the
   district called for that purpose approve the detachment. The Broadmoor
   Police Protection District shall pay the costs of the election. For
   purposes of this section, it shall be conclusively presumed that any
   affected local agency which adopts a resolution under Section 56654
   requesting a detachment of contiguous territory from the Broadmoor
   Police Protection Page 19 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization
   Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 District and which could
   have concurrently requested annexation of the affected territory,
   intends to do so. (b) The Legislature finds and declares that a special
   law is necessary and that a general law cannot be made applicable
   within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California
   Constitution because of the following special circumstances: The
   Broadmoor Police Protection District consists primarily of suburban
   residential properties which have long enjoyed an urban level of police
   services. The threat of continued piecemeal detachments of territory
   from the district threatens its ability to continue providing that
   level of service on an economically efficient basis. (c) This section
   shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2002, and as of that date
   is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted prior to
   January 1, 2002, deletes or extends that date. 56133. (a) A city or
   district may provide new or extended services by contract or agreement
   outside its jurisdictional boundaries only if it first requests and
   receives written approval from the commission in the affected county.
   (b) The commission may authorize a city or district to provide new or
   extended services outside its jurisdictional boundaries but within its
   sphere of influence in anticipation of a later change of organization.
   (c) The commission may authorize a city or district to provide new or
   extended services outside its jurisdictional boundaries and outside its
   sphere of influence to respond to an existing or impending threat to
   the public health or safety of the residents of the affected territory
   if both of the following requirements are met: (1) The entity applying
   for the contract approval has provided the commission with the
   documentation of a threat to the health and safety of the public or the
   affected residents. (2) The commission has notified any alternate
   service provider, including any water corporation as defined in Section
   241 of the Public Utilities Code, or sewer system corporation as
   defined in Section 230.6 of the Public Utilities Code, that has filed a
   map and a statement of its service capabilities with the commission.
   (d) The executive officer, within 30 days of receipt of a request for
   approval by a city or district of a contract to extend services outside
   its jurisdictional boundary, shall determine whether the request is
   complete and acceptable for filing or whether the request is
   incomplete. If a request is determined not to be complete, the
   executive officer shall immediately transmit that determination to the
   requestor, specifying those parts of the request which are incomplete
   and the manner in which they can be made complete. When the request is
   deemed complete, the executive officer shall place the request on the
   agenda of the next commission meeting for which adequate notice can be
   given but not more than 90 days from the date that the request is
   deemed complete, unless the commission has delegated approval of those
   requests to the executive officer. The commission or executive officer
   shall approve, disapprove, or approve with conditions the contract for
   extended services. If the contract is disapproved or approved with
   conditions, the applicant may request reconsideration, citing the
   reasons for reconsideration. (e) This section does not apply to
   contracts or agreements solely involving two or more public agencies
   where the public service to be provided is an alternative to, or
   substitute for, public Page 20 of 140 Pages Local Government
   Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 services
   already being provided by an existing public service provider and where
   the level of service to be provided is consistent with the level of
   service contemplated by the existing service provider. This section
   does not apply to contracts for the transfer of nonpotable or
   nontreated water. This section does not apply to contracts or
   agreements solely involving the provision of surplus water to
   agricultural lands for projects that serve conservation purposes or
   that directly support agricultural industries. However, prior to
   extending surplus water service to any project that will support or
   induce development, the city or district shall first request and
   receive written approval from the commission in the affected county.
   This section shall not apply to an extended service that a city or
   district was providing on January 1, 1994. This section does not apply
   to a local publicly owned electric utility, as defined by Section 9604
   of the Public Utilities Code, providing electric services, which do not
   involve the acquisition, construction, or installation of electric
   distribution facilities by the local publicly owned electric utility,
   outside of the utility's jurisdictional boundaries. CHAPTER 4. NOTICE
   56150. Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, whenever
   this division requires notice to be published, posted, or mailed, the
   notice shall be published, posted, or mailed as provided in this
   chapter. Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, whenever
   this division requires notice to be given that notice shall also be
   given in electronic format on a web site provided by the commission, to
   the extent that the commission maintains such a web site. 56151. Notice
   authorized or required to be given by publication, posting, or mailing
   shall be given by the clerk or executive officer and shall contain all
   matters required by any particular provision of this division. If any
   ordinance, resolution, or order of any legislative body or the
   commission gives notice and contains all matters required to be
   contained in any notice, the clerk or executive officer may cause a
   copy of that ordinance, resolution, or order to be published, posted,
   or mailed, in which case no other notice need be given by the clerk or
   executive officer. 56152. Whenever any notice is required to be given
   and the duty of giving that notice is not specifically enjoined upon
   some officer, agency, or person, the clerk or executive officer, as the
   case may be, shall give notice or cause that notice to be given. 56153.
   Notice required to be published shall be published pursuant to Section
   6061 in one or more newspapers of general circulation within each
   affected county, affected city, or affected district. If any newspaper
   is a newspaper of general circulation in two or more affected cities or
   affected districts, publication in that newspaper shall be sufficient
   publication for all those affected cities or affected districts. If
   there are two or more affected counties, publication shall be made in
   at least one newspaper of general circulation in each of the affected
   counties. 56154. If the published notice is a notice of a hearing,
   publication of the notice shall be commenced at least 21 days prior to
   the date specified in the notice for the hearing. Page 21 of 140 Pages
   Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended
   in 2000 56155. Except as otherwise provided in this division, mailed
   notice shall be sent first class and deposited, postage prepaid, in the
   United States mails and shall be deemed to have been given when so
   deposited. 56156. If the mailed notice is notice of a hearing, the
   notice shall be mailed at least 21 days prior to the date specified in
   the notice for hearing. 56157. When mailed notice is required to be
   given to: (a) A county, city, or district, it shall be addressed to the
   clerk of the county, city, or district. (b) A commission, it shall be
   addressed to the executive officer. (c) Proponents, it shall be
   addressed to the persons so designated in the petition at the address
   specified in the petition. (d) Landowners, it shall be addressed to
   each person to whom land is assessed, as shown upon the most recent
   assessment roll being prepared by the county at the time the conducting
   authority adopts a resolution of application of the county, at the
   address shown upon the assessment roll. (e) Persons requesting special
   notice, it shall be addressed to each person who has filed a written
   request for special notice with the executive officer or clerk at the
   mailing address specified in the request. (f) To all registered voters
   and owners of property, to the address as shown on the most recent
   assessment roll being prepared by the county at the time a resolution
   of application is adopted to initiate proceedings within 300 feet of
   the exterior boundary of the property that is the subject of the
   hearing at least 21 days prior to the hearing. This requirement may be
   waived if proof satisfactory to the commission is presented that shows
   that individual notices to registered voters and landowners have
   already been provided by the initiating agency. Notice shall also
   either be posted or published in one newspaper 21 days prior to the
   hearing. If this section would require more than 1,000 notices to be
   mailed, then notice may instead be provided pursuant to paragraph (1)
   of subdivision (b) of Section 65954.6. 56158. Notice required to be
   posted shall be posted on or near the doors of the meeting room of the
   legislative body or commission or upon any official bulletin board used
   for the purpose of posting public notices by, or pertaining to, the
   legislative body or commission. 56159. Posted notice shall remain
   posted for not less than five days. If the posted notice is notice of a
   hearing, posting shall be commenced at least 21 days prior to the date
   specified in the notice for hearing and shall continue to the time of
   the hearing. 56160. The failure of any person or entity to receive
   notice given pursuant to this division shall not constitute grounds for
   any court to invalidate any action taken for which the notice was
   given. Page 22 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000
   As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 PART 2 - LOCAL AGENCY FORMATION
   COMMISSIONS CHAPTER 1. GENERAL 56300. (a) It is the intent of the
   Legislature that each commission, not later than January 1, 2002, shall
   establish written policies and procedures and exercise its powers
   pursuant to this part in a manner consistent with those policies and
   procedures and that encourages and provides planned, well-ordered,
   efficient urban development patterns with appropriate consideration of
   preserving open-space lands within those patterns. (b) Each commission
   with a proposal pending on January 1, 2001, shall, by March 31, 2001,
   hold a public hearing to discuss the adoption of policies and
   procedures to require the disclosure of contributions, expenditures,
   and independent expenditures authorized by Section 56100.1. Reporting
   requirements adopted pursuant to this section shall be effective upon
   the date of adoption or a later date specified in the resolution. Any
   commission that does not have a proposal pending on January 1, 2001,
   shall hold a public hearing to discuss the adoption of those policies
   and procedures within 90 days of submission of a proposal or at any
   time prior to submission of a proposal. Once a hearing has taken place
   under this subdivision, no subsequent hearing shall be required except
   by petition of 100 or more registered voters residing in the county in
   which the commission is located. (c) A commission may require, through
   the adoption of written policies and procedures, lobbying disclosure
   and reporting requirements for persons who attempt to influence pending
   decisions made by commission members, staff, or consultants. Disclosure
   shall be made either to the commission's executive officer, in which
   case it shall be posted on the commission website, if applicable, or to
   the recorder, registrar of voters, or clerk of the board of supervisors
   of the county in which the commission is located. Each commission that
   on January 1, 2001, has a pending proposal, as defined in Section 56069
   shall, by March 31, 2001, hold a public hearing to discuss the adoption
   of policies and procedures governing lobbying disclosure authorized by
   this subdivision. Reporting requirements adopted pursuant to this
   section shall be effective upon the date of adoption or on a later date
   specified in the resolution. Any commission that does not have a
   proposal pending on January 1, 2001, shall hold a public hearing to
   discuss the adoption of those policies and procedures within 90 days of
   submission of a proposal, or at any time prior to submission of a
   proposal. (d) Any public hearings required by this section may be held
   concurrently. (e) The written policies and procedures adopted by the
   commission shall include forms to be used for various submittals to the
   commission including at a minimum a form for any protests to be filed
   with the commission concerning any proposed organization change. (f)(1)
   On or before January 1, 2002, the commission shall establish and
   maintain, or otherwise provide access to notices and other commission
   information for the public through an Internet website. (2) The written
   policies and procedures adopted by the commission shall require that,
   to the extent that the commission maintains an internet web site,
   notice of all public hearings and commission meetings shall be made
   available in electronic format on that site. Page 23 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 56301. Among the purposes of a commission are discouraging urban
   sprawl, preserving open space and prime agricultural lands, efficiently
   providing government services, and encouraging the orderly formation
   and development of local agencies based upon local conditions and
   circumstances. One of the objects of the commission is to make studies
   and to obtain and furnish information which will contribute to the
   logical and reasonable development of local agencies in each county and
   to shape the development of local agencies so as to advantageously
   provide for the present and future needs of each county and its
   communities. When the formation of a new government entity is proposed,
   a commission shall make a determination as to whether existing agencies
   can feasibly provide the needed service or services in a more efficient
   and accountable manner. If a new single-purpose agency is deemed
   necessary, the commission shall consider reorganization with other
   single-purpose agencies that provide related services. 56302. (a) The
   Legislature finds and declares that nearly 35 years have passed since
   legislators last conducted a thorough investigation of the policies,
   practices, and statutes affecting the organization and boundaries of
   California's local agencies. That effort, which resulted in the
   enactment of the Knox-Nisbet Act, was the product of a careful study by
   the Commission on Metropolitan Area Problems, commissioned by Governor
   Edmund G. Brown, Sr. In the intervening decades, there have been
   fundamental, constitutional, demographic, economic, institutional, and
   political shifts in California and within the state's communities. The
   sustained interest in incorporating new cities, resistance to city
   annexations, problems in financing local agency facilities and
   services, and proposals to detach territory from existing cities
   demonstrate the need for the Legislature and the Governor to reevaluate
   the statutory policies and procedures that have guided California's
   communities for nearly 35 years. Therefore, the Legislature finds and
   declares the necessity for commissioning a careful study of local
   agency organization and boundaries, consistent with its constitutional
   duty pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XI of the
   California Constitution. (b) There is created the Commission on Local
   Governance for the 21st Century which shall consist of 15 members. The
   Governor shall appoint nine members, the Assembly Committee on Rules
   shall appoint three members, and the Senate Committee on Rules shall
   appoint three members. Appointees shall serve until the date that this
   section is repealed, except that, in the event that a vacancy occurs
   due to the resignation of a commissioner, a new member shall be
   appointed by the authority that appointed the resigning member. Of the
   Governor's appointments, one shall be a city representative, one shall
   be a county representative, one shall be a special district
   representative, and one shall be a representative of local agency
   formation commissions. Each appointing authority shall endeavor to
   appoint members who reflect the geographic, ethnic, racial, gender, and
   cultural diversity of the state. Each appointing authority shall
   appoint members who have demonstrated an interest and have proven
   academic or professional ability in the fields of demography, urban
   economics, land use planning, public finance, and the legal aspects of
   local agency organization and boundaries. (c) Notwithstanding Section
   7550.5, on or before December 31, 1999, the commission shall report to
   the Legislature and the Governor regarding all of the following: Page
   24 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As
   Reorganized and Amended in 2000 (1) A review of the current statutes,
   including, but not limited to, this division, regarding the policies,
   criteria, procedures, and precedents for city, county, and special
   district boundary changes. (2) Proposals to add criteria to increase
   citizen and community participation in city, county, and special
   district governments. (3) Proposals to ensure conformity with the
   requirements of federal law, including, but not limited to, the federal
   Voting Rights Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1971). (4) Recommendations
   for statutory changes, if any. (d) The commission shall conduct public
   meetings to solicit the views and advice of the public, including
   elected and appointed officials, regarding city, county, and special
   district organization and boundaries. (e) The commission shall select a
   chair and a vice chair from among its membership. (f) The members of
   the commission shall be reimbursed their actual and necessary expenses
   for attending the meetings of the commission. The commission may
   authorize a payment of a per diem not to exceed one hundred dollars
   ($100) to its members for each day while they are in attendance at
   meetings of the commission. The commission may appoint employees,
   including counsel, define their qualifications and duties, and provide
   for compensation for the performance of those duties. The commission
   may contract with any other public or private agency for any services
   necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. The cost of the
   quarters, equipment, supplies, and operating expenses incurred by the
   commission shall be paid from the appropriation made by the act that
   enacted this section. (g) The commission shall remain in existence
   until July 1, 2000, and as of that date, this section is inoperative.
   This section is repealed on January 1, 2001, unless a later enacted
   statute, enacted on or before January 1, 2001, deletes or extends that
   date and the commission's existence. CHAPTER 2. FORMATION AND
   ORGANIZATION 56325. There is hereby continued in existence in each
   county a local agency formation commission. Except as otherwise
   provided in this chapter, the commission shall consist of members
   selected as follows: (a) Two appointed by the board of supervisors from
   their own membership. The board of supervisors shall appoint a third
   supervisor who shall be an alternate member of the commission. The
   alternate member may serve and vote in place of any supervisor on the
   commission who is absent or who disqualifies himself or herself from
   participating in a meeting of the commission. If the office of a
   regular county member becomes vacant, the alternate member may serve
   and vote in place of the former regular county member until the
   appointment and qualification of a regular county member to fill the
   vacancy. (b) Two selected by the cities in the county, each of whom
   shall be a mayor or council member, appointed by the city selection
   committee. The city selection committee shall also designate one
   alternate member who shall be appointed and serve pursuant to Section
   56335. The alternate shall also be a mayor or council member. The city
   selection committee is Page 25 of 140 Pages Local Government
   Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000
   encouraged to select members to fairly represent the diversity of the
   cities in the county, with respect to population and geography. (c) Two
   presiding officers or members of legislative bodies of independent
   special districts selected by the independent special district
   selection committee pursuant to Section 56332. The independent special
   district selection committee shall also designate a presiding officer
   or member of the legislative body of an independent special district as
   an alternative member who shall be appointed and serve pursuant to
   Section 56332. The independent special district selection committee is
   encouraged to make selections that fairly represent the diversity of
   the independent special districts in the county, with respect to
   population and geography. (d) One representing the general public
   appointed by the other members of the commission. The other members of
   the commission may also designate one alternate member who shall be
   appointed and serve pursuant to Section 56331. Selection of the public
   member and alternate public member shall be subject to the affirmative
   vote of at least one of the members selected by each of the other
   appointing authorities. 56325.1. While serving on the commission, all
   commission members shall exercise their independent judgment on behalf
   of the interests of residents, property owners, and the public as a
   whole in furthering the purposes of this division. Any member appointed
   on behalf of local governments shall represent the interests of the
   public as a whole and not solely the interests of the appointing
   authority. This section does not require the abstention of any member
   on any matter, nor does it create a right of action in any person.
   56326. In Los Angeles County, the commission shall consist of nine
   members, selected as follows: (a) Two appointed by the board of
   supervisors from its own membership. The board of supervisors shall
   also appoint a third supervisor who shall be an alternate member of the
   commission. The alternate member may serve and vote in place of any
   supervisor on the commission who is absent or who disqualifies himself
   or herself from participating in a meeting of the commission. If the
   office of the regular county member becomes vacant, the alternate
   member may serve and vote in place of the former regular county member
   until the appointment and qualification of a regular county member to
   fill the vacancy. (b) One appointed by the board of supervisors, who
   shall not be a member of the board of supervisors but who shall be a
   resident of the San Fernando Valley Statistical Area, as defined in
   subdivision (c) of Section 11093. The board of supervisors shall also
   appoint an alternate member who shall not be a member of the board of
   supervisors but who is a resident of the San Fernando Valley
   Statistical Area. The alternate member may serve and vote in place of
   the member appointed pursuant to this subdivision if that member is
   absent or disqualifies himself or herself from participating in a
   meeting of the commission. If the office of the regular member becomes
   vacant, the alternate member may serve and vote in place of the former
   regular member until the appointment and qualification of a regular
   member to fill the vacancy. (c) Two selected by the cities in the
   county, each of whom shall be a mayor or council member, appointed by
   the city selection committee. The city selection committee shall also
   Page 26 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As
   Reorganized and Amended in 2000 designate one alternate member who
   shall be appointed and serve pursuant to Section 56335. The alternate
   shall also be a mayor or council member. The city selection committee
   is encouraged to select members to fairly represent the diversity of
   the cities in the county, with respect to population and geography. (d)
   One selected by a city in the county having a population in excess of
   30 percent of the total population of the county who is a member of the
   legislative body of the city, appointed by the presiding officer of the
   legislative body. The presiding officer of the legislative body shall
   also designate an alternate member who is a member of the legislative
   body. The alternate member may serve and vote in place of the member
   appointed pursuant to this subdivision if the member is absent or
   disqualifies himself or herself from participating in a meeting of the
   commission. If the office of the regular member becomes vacant, the
   alternate member may serve and vote in place of the former regular
   member until the appointment and qualification of a regular member to
   fill the vacancy. (e) Two presiding officers or members of legislative
   bodies of independent special districts selected by an independent
   special district selection committee pursuant to Section 56332. The
   independent special district selection committee shall also designate
   one alternate member who shall be a presiding officer or member of the
   legislative body of an independent special district and shall be
   appointed and serve pursuant to Section 56332. The independent special
   district selection committee is encouraged to select members to fairly
   represent the diversity of the independent special districts in the
   county, with respect to population and geography. (f) One representing
   the general public appointed by the other members of the commission.
   56326.5. In Sacramento County, the commission shall consist of seven
   members, selected as follows: (a) Two appointed by the board of
   supervisors from their own membership. The board of supervisors shall
   appoint a third supervisor who shall serve as an alternate member of
   the commission. The alternate member may serve and vote in place of any
   supervisor on the commission who is absent or who disqualifies himself
   or herself from participating in a meeting of the commission. If the
   office of the regular county member becomes vacant, the alternate
   member may serve and vote in place of the former regular county member
   until the appointment and qualification of a regular county member to
   fill the vacancy. (b) One selected by the City of Sacramento who is a
   member of the city council, appointed by the mayor and confirmed by the
   city council. The mayor shall also appoint, subject to confirmation by
   the council, an alternate member who is a member of the city council.
   The alternate member may serve and vote in place of the regular city
   member if the city member is absent or disqualifies himself or herself
   from participating in a meeting of the commission. If the office of the
   regular city member becomes vacant, the alternate member may serve and
   vote in place of the former regular city member until the appointment
   and qualification of a regular city member to fill the vacancy. (c) One
   selected by the cities in the county, who is a mayor or council member
   appointed by the city selection committee. The city selection committee
   shall also designate one alternate member who shall be appointed and
   serve pursuant to Section 56335. The alternate shall also be Page 27 of
   140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized
   and Amended in 2000 a mayor or council member. The city selection
   committee is encouraged to select members to fairly represent the
   diversity of the cities in the county, with respect to population and
   geography. (d) Two presiding officers or members of legislative bodies
   of independent special districts selected by an independent special
   district selection committee pursuant to Section 56332. The independent
   special district selection committee shall also designate one alternate
   member who shall be a presiding officer or member of the legislative
   body of an independent special district and shall be appointed and
   serve pursuant to Section 56332. The independent special district
   selection committee is encouraged to select members to fairly represent
   the diversity of the independent special districts in the county, with
   respect to population and geography. (e) One representing the general
   public, appointed by the other six members of the commission. The
   commission may also appoint an alternate public member who may serve
   and vote in the place of the regular public member if the regular
   public member is absent or disqualifies himself or herself from
   participating in a meeting of the commission. If the office of the
   regular public member becomes vacant, the alternate member may serve
   and vote in place of the former regular public member until the
   appointment and qualification of a regular public member to fill the
   vacancy. 56327. In Santa Clara County, the commission shall consist of
   five members, selected as follows: (a) Two appointed by the board of
   supervisors from their own membership. The board of supervisors shall
   appoint a third supervisor who shall serve as an alternate member of
   the commission. The alternate member may serve and vote in place of any
   supervisor on the commission who is absent or who disqualifies himself
   or herself from participating in a meeting of the commission. If the
   office of the regular county member becomes vacant, the alternate
   member may serve and vote in place of the former regular county member
   until the appointment and qualification of a regular county member to
   fill the vacancy. (b) One selected by the city in the county having the
   largest population, who is a member of the legislative body of the
   city, appointed by the city council. The city council shall also
   appoint an alternate member who is a member of the legislative body of
   the city. The alternate member may serve and vote in place of the
   regular city member if the city member is absent or disqualifies
   himself or herself from participating in a meeting of the commission.
   If the office of the regular city member becomes vacant, the alternate
   member may serve and vote in place of the former regular city member
   until the appointment and qualification of a regular city member to
   fill the vacancy. (c) One selected by the cities in the county, who is
   a mayor or council member appointed by the city selection committee.
   The city selection committee shall also designate one alternate member
   who shall be appointed and serve pursuant to Section 56335. The
   alternate shall also be a mayor or council member. The city selection
   committee is encouraged to select members to fairly represent the
   diversity of the cities in the county, with respect to population and
   geography. (d) One representing the general public, appointed by the
   other four members of the commission. This member shall not be a
   resident of a city which is already represented on the commission. The
   commission may also appoint an alternate public member, who shall not
   be a resident of a city represented on the commission, and who may
   serve and vote in the place of the Page 28 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 regular public member if the regular public member is absent or
   disqualifies himself or herself from participating in a meeting of the
   commission. If the office of the regular public member becomes vacant,
   the alternate member may serve and vote in place of the former regular
   public member until the appointment and qualification of a regular
   public member to fill the vacancy. 56327.3. In Santa Clara County, the
   commission shall be enlarged by two members if, pursuant to the
   provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56820), the commission
   orders representation of special districts upon the commission. 56328.
   (a) In San Diego County, the commission, which consists of seven
   members, augmented pursuant to Section 56332, shall be additionally
   augmented by the appointment of an eighth member and that member shall,
   notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 56325, be a member of the
   legislative body of the city in the county having the largest
   population, appointed by the legislative body of that city. (b) The
   legislative body of the city shall appoint an alternate member at the
   same time and in the same manner as it appoints the regular member
   appointed pursuant to subdivision (a). If the regular city member is
   absent from a commission meeting, or disqualifies himself or herself
   from participating in a meeting, the alternate member may serve and
   vote in place of the regular city member for that meeting. If the
   office of the regular city member becomes vacant, the alternate member
   may serve and vote in place of the former regular city member until the
   appointment and qualification of a regular city member to fill the
   vacancy. 56329. If there is no city in the county, the commission shall
   consist of five members, selected as follows, which may be further
   augmented pursuant to Sections 56332 and 56332.5: (a) Three appointed
   by the board of supervisors from their own membership. The board of
   supervisors shall appoint a fourth supervisor who is an alternate
   member of the commission. The alternate member may serve and vote in
   place of any supervisor on the commission who is absent or who
   disqualifies himself or herself from participating in a meeting of the
   commission. If the office of a regular county member becomes vacant,
   the alternate member may serve and vote in place of the former regular
   county member until the appointment and qualification of a regular
   county member to fill the vacancy. (b) Two representing the general
   public appointed by the other members of the commission. Selection of
   the public member and alternate public member shall be subject to the
   affirmative vote of at least one of the members selected by each of the
   other appointing authorities. 56330. REPEALED. 56331. When appointing a
   public member pursuant to Sections 56325, 56326, 56329, and 56330, the
   commission may also appoint one alternate public member who may serve
   and vote in place of a regular public member who is absent or who
   disqualifies himself or herself from participating in a meeting of the
   commission. If the office of a regular public member becomes vacant,
   the alternate member may serve and vote in place of the former regular
   public member until the appointment and qualification of a regular
   public member to fill the vacancy. No Page 29 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 person appointed as a public member or alternate public member
   pursuant to this chapter shall be an officer or employee of the county
   or any city or district with territory in the county, provided,
   however, that any officer or employee serving on January 1, 1994, may
   complete the term for which he or she was appointed. 56331.3. If two or
   more members are absent or disqualify themselves from participating in
   a meeting of the commission, any alternate member who is authorized to
   serve and vote in the place of a member shall only have one vote.
   56332. (a) The independent special district selection committee shall
   consist of the presiding officer of the legislative body of each
   independent special district. However, if the presiding officer of an
   independent special district is unable to attend a meeting of the
   independent special district selection committee, the legislative body
   of the district may appoint one of its members to attend the meeting of
   the selection committee in the presiding officer's place. Those
   districts shall include districts located wholly within the county and
   those containing territory within the county representing 50 percent or
   more of the assessed value of taxable property of the district, as
   shown on the last equalized county assessment roll. Each member of the
   committee shall be entitled to one vote for each independent special
   district of which he or she is the presiding officer. Members
   representing a majority of the eligible districts shall constitute a
   quorum. (b) The executive officer shall call and give written notice of
   all meetings of the members of the selection committee. A meeting shall
   be called and held under either of the following circumstances: (1)
   Whenever a vacancy exists among the members or alternate members
   representing independent special districts upon the commission. (2)
   Upon receipt of a written request by one or more members of the
   selection committee representing districts having 10 percent or more of
   the assessed value of taxable property within the county, as shown on
   the last equalized county assessment roll. (c) (1) If the executive
   officer determines that a meeting of the special district selection
   committee, for the purpose of selecting the special district
   representatives or for filling a vacancy, is not feasible, the
   executive officer may conduct the business of the committee in writing,
   as provided in this subdivision. The executive officer may call for
   nominations to be submitted in writing within 30 days. At the end of
   the nominating period, the executive officer shall prepare and deliver,
   or send by certified mail, to each independent special district one
   ballot and voting instructions. (2) As an alternative to the delivery
   or certified mail, the executive officer, with the prior concurrence of
   the district, may transmit the ballot and voting instructions by
   electronic mail, provided that the executive officer shall retain
   written evidence of the receipt of that material. (3) The ballot shall
   include the names of all nominees and the office for which each was
   nominated. The districts shall return the ballots to the executive
   officer by the date specified in the voting instructions, which date
   shall be at least 30 days from the date on which the executive officer
   mailed the ballots to the districts. Page 30 of 140 Pages Local
   Government Reorganization Act of 2000 As Reorganized and Amended in
   2000 (4) If the executive officer has transmitted the ballot and voting
   instructions by electronic mail, the districts may return the ballots
   to the executive officer by electronic mail, provided that the
   executive officer retains written evidence of the receipt of the
   ballot. (5) Any ballot received by the executive officer after the
   specified date is invalid. The executive officer shall announce the
   results of the election within seven days of the specified date. (d)
   The selection committee shall appoint two regular members and one
   alternate member to the commission. The members so appointed shall be
   elected or appointed special district officers residing within the
   county but shall not be members of the legislative body of a city or
   county. If one of the regular district members is absent from a
   commission meeting or disqualifies himself or herself from
   participating in a meeting, the alternate district member may serve and
   vote in place of the regular district member for that meeting. The
   representation by a regular district member who is a special district
   officer shall not disqualify, or be cause for disqualification of, the
   member from acting on a proposal affecting the special district. The
   special district selection committee may, at the time it appoints a
   member or alternate, provide that the member or alternate is
   disqualified from voting on proposals affecting the district of which
   the member is a representative. (e) If the office of a regular district
   member becomes vacant, the alternate member may serve and vote in place
   of the former regular district member until the appointment and
   qualification of a regular district member to fill the vacancy.
   56332.5. If the commission does not have representation from
   independent special districts on January 1, 2001, the commission shall
   initiate proceedings for representation of independent special
   districts upon the commission if requested by independent special
   districts pursuant to this section. If an independent special district
   adopts a resolution proposing representation of independent special
   districts upon the commission, it shall immediately forward a copy of
   the resolution to the executive officer. Upon receipt of those
   resolutions from a majority of independent special districts within a
   county, adopted by the districts within one year from the date that the
   first resolution was adopted, the commission, at its next regular
   meeting, shall adopt a resolution of intention. The resolution of
   intention shall state whether the proceedings are initiated by the
   commission or by an independent special district or districts, in which
   case, the names of those districts shall be set forth. The commission
   shall order the executive officer to call and give notice of a meeting
   of the independent special district selection committee to be held
   within 15 days after the adoption of the resolution in order to select
   independent special district representation on the commission pursuant
   to Section 56332. 56333. When a commission is enlarged to seven members
   as provided in Section 56332, the public members appointed pursuant to
   Sections 56325, 56329, and 56330 shall thereafter be appointed by
   members of the commission representing cities, counties, and special
   districts. Those appointments shall be made at the times and in the
   manner provided in Section 56334. 56334. The term of office of each
   member shall be four years and until the appointment and qualification
   of his or her successor. Upon enlargement of the commission by two
   members, as Page 31 of 140 Pages Local Government Reorganization Act of
   2000 As Reorganized and Amended in 2000 provided in Section 56332, the
   new members first appointed to represent independent special districts
   shall classify themselves by lot so that the expiration date of the
   term of office of one new member coincides with the existing member who
   holds the office represented by the original two-year term on the
   commission and of the other new member coincides with the existing
   member who holds the office represented by the original four-year term
   on the commission. The body which originally appointed a member whose
   term has expired shall appoint his or her successor for a full term of
   four years. Any member may be removed at any time and without cause by
   the body appointing that member. The expiration date of the term of
   office of each member shall be the first Monday in May in the year in
   which the term of the member expires, unless procedures adopted by the
   commission specify an alternate date to apply uniformly to all members;
   provided, however, that the length of a term of office shall not be
   extended more than once. Any vacancy in the membership of the
   commission shall be filled for the
